Massachusetts, session 194th, S932.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The department of higher education shall review the practice of requiring applicants to
take a standardized college entrance aptitude test to gain admittance to an undergraduate degree
program at a public institution of higher education in the commonwealth.
The review shall include an analysis of the number of public institutions of higher
education in Massachusetts and in other states that require a standardized college entrance
aptitude test, that make the test optional, or that do not permit the use of the tests and recent
trends in this area; the number of states that do not require or do not permit the use of such tests
by law or regulation and their experience; the impact on student success and achievement of not
requiring or not permitting the use of such tests; the extent to which the SAT and ACT tests
of 2

accurately and reliably measure skills and knowledge that indicate a student’s achievements,
abilities and college readiness; evidence of bias in the tests; and the impact of standardized
admission tests on diversity among students, including diversity among racial and ethnic groups,
income and wealth resources, and among immigrant and first-generation students, and other
topics as determined by the department.
In preparing the review, the department shall consult with people concerned with or with
expertise regarding standardized admission tests, including leaders of secondary and public
higher education institutions, students of public higher education institutions, people with
academic expertise in admission criteria and standardized testing, organizations concerned about
standardized admissions testing; organizations representing people of color, immigrants, and
low-income people, and others as determined by the department.
The review shall be published on the website of the department and submitted to the
chairs of the joint committee on higher education, the joint committee on education, and the joint
committee on racial equity, civil rights, and inclusion no later than 1 year after the effective date
of this act.
of 2